Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6867YC (5) 91 da/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 673B.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âAgricultural sourceâ means a location where an 4 agricultural commodity, including a farm animal or farm crop as 5 defined in section 673A.3, is produced, stored, or processed. 6 2. âGreenhouse gasâ means a gas derived from human activity 7 or a natural source that is any of the following: 8 a. Originating from any of the following: 9 (1) An agricultural source. 10 (2) A renewable fuel source. 11 b. Any of the following gases: 12 (1) Carbon dioxide. 13 (2) Hydrofluorocarbons. 14 (3) Methane. 15 (4) Nitrogen trifluoride. 16 (5) Nitrous oxide. 17 (6) Sulfur hexafluoride. 18 (7) Perfluorocarbons. 19 3. âRegulatory authorityâ means the department of natural 20 resources or a federal agency regulating greenhouse gas 21 emissions, including the United States environmental protection 22 agency. 23 4. âRenewable fuel sourceâ means a location where renewable 24 fuel, as defined in section 214A.1, is manufactured, stored, 25 or dispensed. 26 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 673B.2 Action based on climate ââ 27 limitation on liability. 28 1. Subject to section 673B.3, in any civil or criminal 29 action, a defendant is not liable, and is not subject to 30 any judicial remedy, under any principle of law or equity, 31 for damages or injury from any alleged actual or potential 32 effect on climate caused wholly or partly by a greenhouse gas 33 emission. 34 2. Subsection 1 applies regardless of the civil or criminal 35 -1- LSB 6867YC (5) 91 da/js 1/ 3 H.F. _____ action brought or type of relief sought, whether legal or 1 equitable. 2 3. A person bringing a civil or criminal action that alleges 3 damages or injury as described in subsection 1 must do all of 4 the following: 5 a. Specify each greenhouse gas emitted by the defendant that 6 as asserted gives rise to the civil or criminal action. 7 b. Show by clear and convincing evidence that unavoidable 8 and identifiable damage or injury has resulted or will 9 result as a direct cause of the defendantâs violation of an 10 enforceable statutory limitation or restriction or a valid, 11 enforceable operating, air, or other permit issued to the 12 defendant by a regulatory authority. 13 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 673B.3 Action based on climate ââ 14 applicability. 15 Section 673B.2 applies unless the district court in the 16 civil or criminal case finds by clear and convincing evidence 17 that the defendant has violated any of the following: 18 1. An enforceable statutory limitation or restriction 19 governing the emission of a specific greenhouse gas originating 20 within this state. 21 2. An express term of a valid, enforceable operating, 22 air, or other permit issued to the defendant by a regulatory 23 authority that has jurisdiction over the defendantâs greenhouse 24 gas emissions. 25 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 673B.4 Statutory construction. 26 This chapter shall not be construed to create either a right 27 to bring any civil or criminal action, or a judicial remedy, 28 under any principle of law or equity, based on the potential 29 effect on climate caused wholly or partly by a greenhouse gas 30 emission. 31